Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.270

Temporary cease and desist order—Injunction to set aside, limit, or suspend temporary order.

(1) Within ten days after a savings bank or holding company has been served with a temporary cease and desist order, the savings bank or holding company may apply to the superior court in the county of its principal place of business for an injunction setting aside, limiting, or suspending the order pending the completion of the administrative proceedings pursuant to the notice served under RCW 32.04.250.

(2) The superior court shall have jurisdiction to issue the injunction.

[ 2010 c 88 s 47; 1979 c 46 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2010 c 88: See RCW 32.50.900.

Severability—1979 c 46: See note following RCW 32.04.250.